Missouri, session 2026, HB1639.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 173 and 324, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 173.2525 and 324.1172, to read as follows:
173.2525. 1. This section and section 324.1172 shall be known and may be cited
as the "Missouri Pathways to Access and Success Act (PASA)".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Accommodation", any modification or adjustment to the environment,
format, or administrative process intended to ensure equal access and opportunity for
an individual with a disability;
(2) "Disability", a physical or mental impairment substantially limiting one or
more major life activities, as defined under the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA),
42 U.S.C. Section 12101 et seq.
3. Each public institution of higher education shall adopt a policy on the
documentation the institution requires from an enrolled or admitted student to establish
that the student has a disability and is therefore eligible for accommodations. The
policy shall make any of the following documentation sufficient to establish that the
student has a disability:
(1) Documentation that the student has had an individualized education
program (IEP) under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C.
Section 1400 et seq., as amended;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1639 2
(2) Documentation that the student has received services or accommodations
under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973;
(3) Documentation that the student has received services under the Americans
with Disabilities Act (ADA);
(4) A record or evaluation from a licensed professional finding that the student
has a disability;
(5) A plan or record of disability services for the student from another
institution of higher education; or
(6) Documentation of a disability due to military service in the uniformed
services, as defined in 20 U.S.C. Section 1091c(a).
4. A public institution of higher education may establish less burdensome
criteria to establish that a student has a disability than the criteria described in
subsection 3 of this section.
5. The policy adopted under this section shall be transparent and provide
information about the process for determining eligibility for accommodations. Each
public institution of higher education shall disseminate such information to students,
parents, and faculty in accessible formats, including during orientation, and shall make
the information publicly available on the institution's website.
324.1172. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Accommodation", any modification or adjustment to the environment,
format, or administrative process intended to ensure equal access and opportunity for
an individual with a disability;
(2) "Accommodation request", any request for accommodations on a
professional licensing examination made by an applicant;
(3) "Applicant", any individual applying to take a professional licensing
examination;
(4) "Disability", a physical or mental impairment substantially limiting one or
more major life activities, as defined under the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA),
42 U.S.C. Section 12101 et seq.;
(5) "Licensing body", any agency, board, commission, or entity responsible for
administering a professional licensing examination in this state;
(6) "Professional licensing examination", any examination required to be
successfully passed in order to obtain a license, certificate, registration, permit, or other
authorization to legally practice an occupation or profession in this state;
(7) "Qualified treating professional", a clinician who:
(a) Is licensed or certified in a field relevant to the applicant's disability
including, but not limited to, psychologists, psychiatrists, physicians, nurse

HB 1639 3
practitioners, audiologists, occupational therapists, speech therapists, and licensed
mental health professionals;
(b) Has an existing therapeutic or clinical relationship with the applicant;
(c) Has conducted an individualized evaluation that reviews medical or
psychological history, functional limitations, and diagnostic testing; and
(d) Is qualified to interpret assessment results and explain how those limitations
justify the requested accommodation.
2. An applicant's documented history of receiving accommodations during
secondary, postsecondary, or graduate education, or on comparable standardized
examinations, shall be considered strong evidence of the need for similar
accommodations and shall create a rebuttable presumption of eligibility for similar
accommodations on professional licensing examinations.
3. If an applicant provides documentation from a qualified treating professional
that certifies the need for a specific accommodation on a professional licensing
examination, the licensing body shall grant such accommodation unless the licensing
body provides clear and convincing evidence demonstrating that the requested
accommodation would fundamentally alter the nature of the examination or pose an
undue burden.
4. The opinion of a qualified treating professional shall be presumed valid and
afforded substantial deference by licensing bodies. Licensing bodies shall not deny
accommodations on a professional licensing examination based solely on the opinion of
an expert who has not personally examined or treated the applicant unless objective
evidence of fraud or misrepresentation supports the denial.
5. Licensing bodies shall provide written notification of decisions within thirty
days of receiving a complete application for a professional licensing examination
accompanied by an accommodation request.
6. Any denial of an accommodation request shall include a detailed explanation
specifying the reasons for denial, the evidence relied upon, and the qualifications and
credentials of any experts whose opinions were used.
7. Licensing bodies shall not impose excessive or repeated documentation
requirements for applicants making accommodation requests. Documentation
previously accepted by educational institutions or other examination bodies shall be
sufficient unless the licensing body provides clear evidence of a material change in
circumstances.
8. Licensing bodies that use experts to assist them in evaluating accommodation
requests shall:

HB 1639 4
(1) Engage only experts with specialized training in ADA compliance and
accommodation evaluations;
(2) Ensure the experts are independent and impartial; and
(3) Ensure the experts disclose all compensation, past recommendations, and
potential conflicts of interest to the applicant upon request.
9. Any applicant denied accommodations on a professional licensing
examination shall have the right to appeal to an independent review panel established
within the division of professional registration of the department of commerce and
insurance. The panel shall consist of three members appointed by the director of the
department of commerce and insurance, including at least one disability rights
advocate, one licensed professional examiner, and one attorney licensed in this state.
The panel shall render a decision within forty-five days of the filing of an appeal. The
decision of the panel shall be binding on the licensing body.
10. Any licensing body found by the independent review panel established in
subsection 9 of this section or a court of competent jurisdiction to have wrongfully
denied an accommodation shall reimburse the applicant for reasonable attorney's fees
and costs incurred in administrative proceedings, appeals, or litigation necessary to
obtain the accommodation.
11. Each licensing body shall annually report to the department of commerce
and insurance the number of accommodation requests received, granted, denied, and
appealed and the outcomes thereof. The reports shall be disaggregated by licensing
body and published on the department's public website before February first of each
year.
12. All licensing bodies shall provide ADA and accommodation compliance
training to all personnel involved in evaluating accommodation requests at least once
every two years. The training shall be provided by an external ADA compliance expert
approved by the Missouri commission on human rights or a federally recognized ADA
training entity.
13. No licensing body shall retaliate against an applicant for making an
accommodation request or appealing a denial of an accommodation request.
✔